Nebraska, session 109, LB136.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB136 LB136
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 25-1030.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
25-1030.01 (1) Upon filing an application for determination of
liability of the garnishee, the plaintiff shall give the garnishee and
the defendant in the original action notice of the filing thereof and of
the time and place of trial thereon. The notice shall be given within
such time and in such manner as the court shall direct.
(2)(a) For purposes of this section, corporate entity means any
corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or
series limited liability company or any other corporate entity that is
required by the statutes of Nebraska to have a registered agent for
service of process in Nebraska.
(b) If the garnishee is a corporate entity, such notice shall be
served upon the corporate entity's registered agent for service of
process in this state.
Sec. 2. Section 25-1056, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-1056 (1) In all cases when a judgment has been entered by any
court of record and the judgment creditor or his or her agent or attorney
has filed an affidavit setting forth the amount due on the judgment,
interest, and costs in the office of the clerk of the court where the
judgment has been entered and that he or she has good reason to and does
believe that any person, partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation, naming him, her, or it, has property of and is indebted to
the judgment debtor, the clerk shall issue a summons which shall set
forth the amount due on the judgment, interest, and costs as shown in the
affidavit and require such person, partnership, limited liability
company, or corporation, as garnishee, to answer written interrogatories
to be furnished by the plaintiff and to be attached to such summons
respecting the matters set forth in section 25-1026. The summons shall be
returnable within ten days from the date of its issuance and shall
-2-

LB136 LB136
2025 2025
require the garnishee to answer within ten days from the date of service
upon him or her. Except when wages are involved, the garnishee shall hold
the property of every description and the credits of the defendant in his
or her possession or under his or her control at the time of the service
of the summons and interrogatories until the further order of the court.
If the only property in the possession or under the control of the
garnishee at the time of the service of the summons and interrogatories
is credits of the defendant and the amount of such credits is not in
dispute by the garnishee, then such garnishee shall only hold the credits
of the defendant in his or her possession or under his or her control at
the time of the service of the summons and interrogatories to the extent
of the amount of the judgment, interest, and costs set forth in the
summons until further order of the court. When wages are involved, the
garnishee shall pay to the employee all disposable earnings exempted from
garnishment by statute, and any disposable earnings remaining after such
payment shall be retained by the garnishee until further order of the
court. Thereafter, the service of the summons and interrogatories and all
further proceedings shall be in all respects the same as is provided for
in sections 25-1011 and 25-1026 to 25-1031.01 unless inconsistent with
this section.
(2) If it appears from the answer of the garnishee that the judgment
debtor was an employee of the garnishee, that the garnishee otherwise
owed earnings to the judgment debtor when the garnishment order was
served, or that earnings would be owed within sixty days thereafter and
there is not a successful written objection to the order or the answer of
the garnishee filed, on application by the judgment creditor, the court
shall order that the nonexempt earnings, if any, withheld by the
garnishee after service of the order be transferred to the court for
delivery to the judgment creditor who is entitled to such earnings.
Except for garnishments in support of a person, the payments may be made
payable to the judgment creditor or assignee and shall be forwarded to
-3-

LB136 LB136
2025 2025
the issuing court to record the judgment payment prior to the court
delivering the payment to the judgment creditor or assignee. The court
shall, upon application of the judgment creditor, further order that the
garnishment is a continuing lien against the nonexempt earnings of the
judgment debtor. An order of continuing lien on nonexempt earnings
entered pursuant to this section shall require the garnishee to continue
to withhold the nonexempt earnings of the judgment debtor for as long as
the continuing lien remains in effect.
Beginning with the pay period during which the writ was served and
while the continuing lien remains in effect, the garnishee shall deliver
the nonexempt earnings to the court from which the garnishment was issued
for each pay period or on a monthly basis if the garnishee so desires and
shall deliver to the judgment debtor his or her exempt earnings for each
pay period.
(3) A continuing lien ordered pursuant to this section shall be
invalid and shall have no force and effect upon the occurrence of any of
the following:
(a) The underlying judgment is satisfied in full or vacated or
expires;
(b) The judgment debtor leaves the garnishee's employ for more than
sixty days;
(c) The judgment creditor releases the garnishment;
(d) The proceedings are stayed by a court of competent jurisdiction,
including the United States Bankruptcy Court;
(e) The judgment debtor has not earned any nonexempt earnings for at
least sixty days;
(f) The court orders that the garnishment be quashed; or
(g) Ninety days have expired since service of the writ. The judgment
creditor may extend the lien for a second ninety-day period by filing
with the court a notice of extension during the fifteen days immediately
prior to the expiration of the initial lien, and the continuing lien in
-4-

LB136 LB136
2025 2025
favor of the initial judgment creditor shall continue for a second
ninety-day period.
(4)(a) To determine priority, garnishments and liens shall rank
according to time of service.
(b) Garnishments, liens, and wage assignments which are not for the
support of a person shall be inferior to wage assignments for the support
of a person. Garnishments which are not for the support of a person and
liens shall be inferior to garnishments for the support of a person.
(5) Only one order of continuing lien against earnings due the
judgment debtor shall be in effect at one time. If an employee's wages
are already being garnished pursuant to a continuing lien at the time of
service of a garnishment upon an employer, the answer to garnishment
interrogatories shall include such information along with the date of
termination of such continuing lien and the title of the case from which
such garnishment is issued. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, a continuing lien obtained pursuant to this section shall have
priority over any subsequent garnishment or wage assignment.
(6)(a) In any case involving service of a garnishment summons on a
financial institution where deposits are received within this state, the
financial institution shall (i) if its main chartered office is located
in this state, designate its main chartered office for the service of
summons or (ii) if its main chartered office is located in another state,
designate any one of its offices or branches or its agent for service of
process in this state for service of summons. The designation of a main
chartered office or an office or branch or the agent for service of
process under this subdivision shall be made by filing a notice of
designation with the Department of Banking and Finance, shall contain the
physical address of the main chartered office or the office or branch or
the agent for service of process designated, and shall be effective upon
placement on the department website. The department shall post the list
of such designated main chartered offices and offices or branches or
-5-

LB136 LB136
2025 2025
agents for service of process on its website for access by the public. A
financial institution may modify or revoke a designation made under this
subdivision by filing the modification or revocation with the department.
The modification or revocation shall be effective when the department's
website has been updated to reflect the modification or revocation,
except that the judgment creditor may rely upon the designation that was
modified or revoked during the thirty-day period following the effective
date of the modification or revocation if the summons is timely served
upon the financial institution. The department shall update its website
to reflect a filing by a financial institution pursuant to this
subdivision or a modification or revocation filed by a financial
institution pursuant to this subdivision within ten business days
following the filing by the financial institution. The department website
shall reflect the date its online records for each financial institution
have most recently been updated.
(b) If a financial institution where deposits are received has
designated its main chartered office or one of its offices or branches or
its agent for service of process for the service of summons, service made
on the main chartered office or the office or branch or the agent for
service of process so designated shall be valid and effective as to any
property or credits of the defendant in the possession or control of the
main chartered office of the financial institution in this state and any
of the financial institution offices or branches located within this
state. If service of summons is not made on the main chartered office or
the office or branch or the agent for service of process designated by
the financial institution, but instead is made at another office or
branch of the financial institution located in Nebraska, the financial
institution, in its discretion, and without violating any obligation to
its customer, may elect to treat the service of summons as valid and
effective as to any property or credits of the defendant in the
possession or control of the main chartered office of the financial
-6-

LB136 LB136
2025 2025
institution in this state and any of the financial institution offices or
branches located within this state. In the absence of such an election,
the financial institution shall file a statement with the interrogatories
that the summons was not served at the financial institution's designated
location for receiving service of summons and, therefore, was not
processed, and shall provide the address at which the financial
institution is to receive service of summons.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, financial institution means a
bank, savings bank, building and loan association, savings and loan
association, or credit union whether chartered by the United States, the
Department of Banking and Finance, or a foreign state agency.
(d) The notice of designation, modification, or revocation shall be
made by a financial institution on forms prescribed by the Department of
Banking and Finance department.
(e) The Department of Banking and Finance, any employee of the
department, or any person acting on behalf of the department shall be
immune from civil and criminal liability for any acts or omissions which
occur as a result of the requirements of this subsection.
(7)(a) For purposes of this section:
(i) Corporate entity means any corporation, limited liability
company, limited liability partnership, or series limited liability
company or any other corporate entity that is required by the statutes of
Nebraska to have a registered agent for service of process in Nebraska;
and
(ii) Corporate entity does not include any financial institution
described in subsection (6) of this section.
(b) In any case involving service of a garnishment summons or
continuing lien on a corporate entity against wages due to a judgment
debtor from the corporate entity, service shall be made by serving the
corporate entity's registered agent for service of process in this state.
Sec. 3. Original sections 25-1030.01 and 25-1056, Reissue Revised
-7-

LB136 LB136
2025 2025
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-8-